Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.140

Disposition of fees.

All fees provided for in this chapter shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural local fund and used for enforcing and carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter or chapter 16.57 RCW.

[ 2003 c 326 s 57; 1979 c 81 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.